src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper nouns
!  -----
!! Proper nouns in LUSHOOTSEED language 

LEXICON Propernouns
kʷagʷičəd:kʷágʷičəd PROP_with-PL_RED2 "Big Dipper" ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
